Utah statutes.
34-46-201.   Information collected.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an employer may not request the
following information before an applicant is offered a job:
(a)  Social Security number;
(b)  date of birth; or
(c)  driver license number.
(2)  An employer may request the information listed in Subsection (1) before
an applicant is offered a job only if:
(a)  the request for information is applicable to any applicant applying for
the position for which the applicant is applying;
(b)  the information is requested during the time in the employer's employment
selection process when the employer:
(i)  obtains a criminal background check;
(ii)  obtains a credit history of an applicant for employment, subject to the
requirements of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.;
(iii)  obtains a driving record of a driver from the Driver License Division
in accordance with Section 53-3-104 or 53-3-420;
(iv)  subject to Subsection (3), conducts a review of the internal records of
the employer to determine whether:
(A)  the applicant was previously employed by the employer; or
(B)  the applicant previously applied for employment with the employer; or
(v)  collects the information to provide it to a government entity for the
purpose of:
(A)  determining eligibility for a government service, benefit, or program
that requires that the information is collected on or before the day on which
an offer of employment is made; or
(B)  participating in a government service, benefit, or program that requires
that the information is collected on or before the day on which an offer of
employment is made; and
(c)  the applicant consents to the employer taking the action described in
Subsection (2)(b).
(3)  If the information listed in Subsection (1) is requested under Subsection
(2)(b)(iv), the employer may only request that information listed in
Subsection (1) that is necessary to conduct the review of the employer's
internal records.
(4)  An employer violates this section if pursuant to Subsection (2) the
employer requests the information listed in Subsection (1), but fails to take
the action described in Subsection (2)(b) for which the information is
requested.
